Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 4. Miscellaneous Services.

§ 32.1-89.
Health services for persons suffering from hemophilia and related diseases.

The State Board of Health shall establish a program for the care and treatment of persons suffering from hemophilia and other related bleeding diseases who are unable to pay for the entire cost of such services on a continuing basis despite the existence of various types of hospital and medical insurance. The program may include (i) payments on behalf of such persons for obtaining blood, blood derivatives and concentrates, for necessary medical, surgical, dental, hospital and outpatient clinic services and for rehabilitation; (ii) the establishment of, or contracts for, hospital and clinic facilities for the diagnosis and treatment of such persons; (iii) participation in the cost of blood processing to the extent that such participation will facilitate the supplying of blood, blood derivatives and concentrates and other efficacious agents to such persons; and (iv) development of, or participation in the cost of developing, programs for the care and treatment of such persons, including self-administration, prevention and home care and medical and dental procedures and techniques designed to provide maximum control over bleeding episodes typical in such persons.

The State Board of Health may provide home and clinic health services for persons suffering from hemophilia or other related bleeding diseases who are not eligible under subsection A. The State Board of Health may provide such services through cooperative agreements with medical facilities or other appropriate means. Charges for persons receiving care or treatment under this subsection shall be determined by the State Board of Health. Funds received in payment for such services are hereby appropriated to the State Board of Health for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section.

The State Board of Health shall provide for the development, implementation, and sustainability of a process for the receipt and consideration of advice and policy recommendations at least annually from, and on behalf of, persons suffering from hemophilia and other related bleeding diseases, for the purpose of informing programs and services established under this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-8.6; 1976, c. 296; 1979, c. 711; 1985, c. 448; 2002, c. 696; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 696 inserted “or licensed pharmacists” in the third sentence in subsection C.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 74, are identical, and deleted “of this section” from the end of the first sentence of subsection B; and rewrote subsection C, which pertained to the Hemophilia Advisory Board.

§ 32.1-90.
Health services for persons suffering from epilepsy and cystic fibrosis.

The Board may provide, through cooperative agreements with medical facilities or other appropriate means, home and clinic health services for persons suffering from epilepsy and for persons not eligible for child supportive services suffering from cystic fibrosis. Monetary payments from persons for care or treatment under this section shall be determined by the Board. Funds received in payment for such services are hereby appropriated to the Board for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 32-8.3; 32-8.4; 1974, c. 562; 1975, c. 294; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-91.
Repealed by Acts 1980, c. 728.

Cross references.

For present provisions as to compensation and expenses of boards, commissions and similar bodies, see §

2.2-2813

.

§ 32.1-92.
Repealed by Acts 1982, c. 15.

§ 32.1-92.1.
Funding of certain abortions where pregnancy results from rape or incest.

From the moneys appropriated to the Department from the general fund, the Board shall fund abortions for women who otherwise meet the financial eligibility criteria of the State Medical Assistance Plan in any case in which a pregnancy occurs as a result of rape or incest and which is reported to a law-enforcement or public health agency.

History.

1982, c. 644.

Law Review.

For note on abortion funding restrictions, see 39 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1469 (1982).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Abortion, § 1.

§ 32.1-92.2.
Funding of certain abortions where fetus is believed to have incapacitating physical deformity or mental deficiency; physician’s certificate.

From the moneys appropriated to the Department from the general fund, the Board shall fund abortions for women who otherwise meet the financial eligibility criteria of the State Medical Assistance Plan in any case in which a physician who is trained and qualified to perform such tests certifies in writing, after appropriate tests have been performed, that he believes the fetus will be born with a gross and totally incapacitating physical deformity or with a gross and totally incapacitating mental deficiency.

History.

1982, c. 645.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1982 act having been

32.1-92.1

.

Law Review.

For note on abortion funding restrictions, see 39 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1469 (1982).

For essay, “How (Not) to Talk About Abortion,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 425 (2012).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Abortion, § 1.